Mississippi, session 2026, SC513.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: WHEREAS, Article V of the Constitution of the United States provides authority for a Convention to be called by the Congress of the United States for the purpose of proposing Amendments to the Constitution upon application of two-thirds of the legislatures of the separate states ("Madison Amendments Convention"); and WHEREAS, the Legislature of the State of Mississippi favors the proposal and ratification of an Amendment to said Constitution which shall provide Congressional Term Limits; NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED BY THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI, THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES CONCURRING THEREIN: SECTION 1.  That, as provided for in Article V of the Constitution of the United States, the Legislature of the State of Mississippi herewith respectfully applies for an Amendments Convention to be called for the purpose of proposing an Amendment to the Constitution of the United States of America to set a limit on the number of terms that a person may be elected as a Member of the United States House of Representatives and to set a limit on the number of terms that a person may be elected as a Member of the United States Senate. SECTION 2.  This application shall be considered as covering the same subject matter as the applications from other States to Congress to call an Amendments Convention to set a limit on the number of terms that a person may be elected to the House of Representatives of the Congress of the United States and the Senate of the United States; and this application shall be aggregated with the same for the purpose of attaining the two-thirds of states necessary to require Congress to call a limited convention on this subject, but shall not be aggregated with any other applications on any other subject. SECTION 3.  This application constitutes a continuing application in accordance with Article V of the Constitution of the United States of America until the legislatures of at least two-thirds of the several states have made applications on the same subject. BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED, That a certified copy of this application be transmitted by the Secretary of State, to the President of the United States Senate, to the Speaker of the United States House of Representatives, to each member of the applicant's delegation to the United States Congress, and to the presiding officers of each house of the several state legislatures, requesting their cooperation in applying for the Amendments Convention limited to the subject matter contemplated by this application.